North Carolina, session 2025, HB883.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Program Established. – Beginning with the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the Department of Public Instruction shall establish a grant program for local school
administrative units to apply for funds from the Special State Reserve Fund (SSRF) for children
with disabilities for the purpose of covering the extraordinary costs of certain students with
disabilities, including costs associated with the placement of students in private schools with
approved nonpublic education programs providing special education in accordance with a
student's individualized education program (IEP). The grant program shall provide funds for
students with disabilities on an ongoing basis according to the students' IEPs. The grant program
established by this act shall be administered separately from the grant program funded from the
SSRF available to local school administrative units for high costs related to emergency situations
for children with disabilities in a school year. Funds administered pursuant to this act shall
supplement and not supplant existing federal, State, and local funding for children with
disabilities.
SECTION 1.(b) Applications. – A local school administrative unit may apply for
grant funds for a student with disabilities served by the unit for extraordinary costs associated
with services provided to the student, including for a placement in a private school that has an
approved nonpublic education program providing special education in accordance with a
student's IEP. To be eligible for a grant, the local school administrative unit must demonstrate
that the total cost of the services equals or exceeds four times the State average per pupil
expenditure for children with disabilities in the prior fiscal year. The local school administrative
unit shall provide documentation to the Department of Public Instruction to support the funding
request. The student's IEP must support the determination of the services, including if the
placement of the student is at a private school. Grant funds shall be student-specific and follow
the student for special education and related services provided within the State. The Department
*H883-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
shall require documentation for renewal of the grant for each school year with a request for funds
for the student. The Department shall reimburse seventy-five percent (75%) of the extraordinary
costs and disburse funds in quarterly amounts to providers on an approved list from the
Department.
For the purposes of this act, extraordinary costs shall only include costs directly
attributable to providing the special education services on the student's IEP, such as salary of
educational personnel; salary of related services personnel; costs for specialized books, materials,
or equipment; tuition costs; and consultant costs, if directly attributable to the student's
instructional program. Extraordinary costs shall not include administrative or overhead costs, the
costs of adapting classrooms or materials that are used by more than one student, nor the costs
associated with evaluation, development of the IEP, or service coordination for the student with
disabilities.
SECTION 1.(c) Oversight. – The Department of Public Instruction shall ensure that,
if a student who is covered by grant funds is placed in a private school that has an approved
nonpublic education program providing special education in accordance with a student's IEP, the
school is approved by the Department as adhering to State and federal laws governing education
services for students with disabilities and State and federal laws governing seclusion and restraint
of students. The student's local school administrative unit shall remain legally responsible for
ensuring the student is receiving a free appropriate public education in the least restrictive
environment while the student is placed in the private school, as required by State and federal
laws governing education services for students with disabilities, and the unit shall conduct an
annual review of the student's IEP and any interim reviews requested by the student's parent or
legal guardian for purposes of educational decision making in accordance with federal and State
laws. Prior to approving a renewal of the grant for a particular student, the Department shall
ensure that the annual review of the student's IEP has been completed and the student's parent or
legal guardian, for purposes of educational decision making, has received the notice of procedural
safeguards required by State and federal laws governing education services for students with
disabilities.
SECTION 1.(d) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Special State Reserve Fund the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Department of Public Instruction to implement the grant
program established pursuant to this section.
SECTION 1.(e) Report. – By March 15, 2026, the Department of Public Instruction
shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee the number of grant
applications for the 2025-2026 school year, the amount of grant funds awarded, the types of
out-of-school system placements and service providers, and the type of extraordinary costs
reimbursed.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-107.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-107.5. Annual reports.
The State Board shall report no later than October 15 of each year to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee on the implementation of this Article and the educational
performance of children with disabilities. The report may be filed electronically. Each annual
report shall include the following information:
…
(4) A summary analysis of the following data to be monitored and collected by
the Department of Public Instruction on students with disabilities in each local
school administrative unit on a monthly basis:
a. The number of new and continued homebound placements.
b. The number of new and continued modified day placements.
c. The number of new and continued Home/Hospital, Separate Schools,
and Residential placements.
Page 2 House Bill 883-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. The number of new and continued psychiatric residential treatment
facility placements."
SECTION 2.(b) The State Board of Education shall submit the report required under
G.S. 115C-107.5(4), as enacted by this act, beginning October 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 883-First Edition Page 3